District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.04

Agency affirmative action plan — Projections of hires and promotions for period of plan.

The plan shall state the number of hires and promotions the agency projects for the period until the next plan is submitted, and the number of hires and promotions of the groups enumerated in § 1-521.03, projected for that period. Such projections shall be broken down in the manner provided in § 1-521.03.

History

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 5, 22 DCR 6539

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-510.
1973 Ed., § 1-320d.